Rhode Island, session 2025, SB88.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-68-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-68 entitled "Statewide
Municipal Solar Permit" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-68-3. Renewable energy permit.
(a) The office, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate and adopt rules and
regulations that will create a statewide solar photovoltaic permit application that municipalities will
be required to use beginning on January 1, 2018. The office’s rules and regulations shall be adopted
no later than November 1, 2017.
(b) The office, in consultation with the department of environmental management, shall
promulgate and adopt rules and regulations to require including, as part of the solar permit
application, an assessment whether the proposed solar photovoltaic system would be carbon-neutral
in accordance with the emission reduction goals set forth by § 42-6.2-9. The assessment shall detail
the amount of carbon sequestration and carbon storage loss that would occur if the permit is
approved. The office's rules and regulations shall be adopted no later than November 1, 2025.
(c) A solar permit shall only be approved if the proposed solar photovoltaic system is
verified to be carbon neutral based upon the assessment submitted under section (b) of this section.
The office, in consultation with the department of environmental management, shall promulgate
and adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the emission reduction goals set forth by § 42-
6.2-9 to enforce this section.
(b)(d) The office shall establish an advisory group for the purpose of creating a statewide

solar energy permit application form.
(c)(e) The advisory group shall include the following members and may be expanded by
the office in its discretion, to include other personnel with experience and/or expertise in the area
of solar energy:
(1) A renewable energy developer with expertise in residential solar photovoltaic
installation;
(2) A renewable energy developer with expertise in commercial solar photovoltaic
installations; and
(3) Three (3) municipal officials with expertise in building and electric permitting
processes.
SECTION 2. Section 42-98-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-98 entitled "Energy
Facility Siting Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-98-8. Applications — Contents — Acceptance for filing.
(a) The rules and regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to § 42-98-7(c) shall
prescribe the form and contents of applications under this chapter. The applications shall contain
at least the following, where applicable:
(1) Identification of the proposed owner(s) of the facility, including identification of all
affiliates of the proposed owners, as the term is defined in § 39-3-27.
(2) Detailed description of the proposed facility, including its function and operating
characteristics, and complete plans as to all structures, including underground construction and
transmission facilities, underground or aerial, associated with the proposed facility.
The complete plans shall be the basis for determining jurisdiction under the energy facility
siting act and shall be the plans submitted to all agencies whose permit is required under the law.
(3) A detailed description and analysis of the impact of the proposed facility on its physical
and social environment together with a detailed description of all environmental characteristics of
the proposed site, and a summary of all studies prepared and relied upon in connection therewith,
including if the proposed facility would be carbon neutral in accordance with the emission
reduction goals set forth by § 42-6.2-9. The description and analysis shall detail the amount of
carbon sequestration and carbon storage loss that would occur if the facility is permitted.
Where applicable these descriptions and analysis shall include a review of current
independent, scientific research pertaining to electric and magnetic fields (EMF). The review shall
provide data assessing potential health risks associated with EMF exposure. For the purposes of
this chapter “prudent avoidance” shall refer to measures to be implemented in order to protect the
public from EMF exposure.
LC000358 - Page 2 of 4

(4) All studies and forecasts, complete with the information, data, methodology, and
assumptions on which they are based, on which the applicant intends to rely in showing the need
for the proposed facility under the statewide master construction plan submitted annually.
(5) Complete detail as to the estimated construction cost of the proposed facility, the
projected maintenance and operation costs, estimated costs to the community such as safety and
public health issues, storm damage and power outages, estimated costs to businesses and
homeowners due to power outages, the estimated unit cost of energy to be produced by the proposed
facility, and expected methods of financing the facility.
(6) A complete life-cycle management plan for the proposed facility, including measures
for protecting the public health and safety and the environment during the facility’s operations,
including plans for the handling and disposal of wastes from the facility, and plans for the
decommissioning of the facility at the end of its useful life.
(7) A study of alternatives to the proposed facility, including alternatives as to energy
sources, methods of energy production, methods for preserving carbon sequestration and carbon
storage, and sites for the facility, together with reasons for the applicant’s rejection of these
alternatives. The study shall include estimates of facility cost and unit energy costs of alternatives
considered.
(b) Within thirty (30) days of the filing of an applicant under this chapter, the board shall
notify the applicant whether the application is in the form and addresses the matters that are required
by this section and the rules and regulations as are promulgated pursuant to § 42-98-7. An
application meeting these requirements shall then be docketed. Any application deemed to be
deficient shall be returned to the applicant, together with a concise and explicit statement of the
application’s deficiencies. Within fifteen (15) days of the resubmission of an application following
a rejection for deficiency, the board shall docket the application together with specification of
continuing deficiencies noted by the board, if any.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000358
========
LC000358 - Page 3 of 4